Montana, session 2025, HB893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Montana millions lottery game -- proceeds to state property tax
assistance account. (1) The commission shall by rule determine a Montana millions lottery game to maximize
the net revenue paid to the state property tax assistance account provided for in [section 2 of Senate Bill No.
90].
(2) The Montana millions lottery game must:
(a) be held annually on July 4;
(b) result in four prizes of $1 million each; and
(c) allow for the sale of 500,000 tickets sold for $20 each.
(3) After paying for costs by the commission and prizes, the commission shall transfer net revenue
from the Montana millions lottery game tickets to the state property tax assistance account.
(4) The Montana millions lottery game is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $50,000 from the general fund to
the department of revenue for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to implement the provisions of Senate Bill
No. 90.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 23, chapter 7, part 3, and the provisions of Title 23, chapter 7, part 3, apply to [section 1].

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 893

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 893.1
COORDINATION SECTION. Section 4. Coordination instruction. If Senate Bill No. 90 is not
passed and approved, then [this act] is void.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 893